Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6012.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1166. (1) In all public and nonpublic schools in this state regular courses of instruction shall must be given in the constitution of the United States, in the constitution of Michigan, and in the history and present form of government of the United States, Michigan, and its political subdivisions. Instruction shall must begin not later than the opening of the eighth grade, or its equivalent, except in schools maintaining a junior high school, in which case it instruction may begin in the ninth grade. (2) A high school in this state shall require a 1-semester course of study of 5 periods per week in civics. The course shall must include the form and functions of the federal, state, and local governments and shall must stress the rights and responsibilities of citizens. A diploma shall must not be issued by a high school to a pupil who has not successfully completed this course. This course requirement is not a graduation requirement for a high school pupil who has enlisted or been inducted into military service. (3) By not later than May 1, 2018 or the next update of the state curriculum content standards after the effective date of this subsection, whichever occurs first, the The state board shall revise ensure that the state curriculum content standards for high school social studies to ensure that those content standards cover the same content as covered by the 100 incorporate the questions on from the civics portion of the naturalization test used by the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services. as of December 1, 2016.The state board shall update the standards as necessary when the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services revises the civics portion of the naturalization test. (4) Beginning with the first state high school social studies assessment administered after the state academic curriculum content standards are revised as required under subsection (3), the superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that the high school social studies assessment includes, questions related to the learning objectives in the state curriculum standards for high school social studies as revised under subsection (3).or is aligned with, the civics portion of the naturalization test used by the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services. The assessment may incorporate the naturalization test questions as part of the existing civics assessment and must not require additional testing time beyond what is already scheduled for the assessment. (5) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, the board of a school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of a public school academy shall require pupils to pass the civics portion of the naturalization test used by the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services with a score of at least 80 out of 128 before a pupil is awarded a credit described in this section. The requirement under this subsection does not apply to a pupil whose individualized education program team determines that the pupil is unable to complete the naturalization test or a pupil who has enlisted or been inducted into military service. (6) (5) As used in this section: , "state (a) "Individualized education program" means that term as defined in section 1704. (b) "State curriculum content standards" means the state board recommended model curriculum content standards developed and periodically updated under section 1278.